Maryland, session 2025, SB0306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–663.
(a) (1) The Commission shall adopt regulations setting standards for the
assessment of fines under § 9–664 of this Part IX of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0306*

SENATE BILL 306
(2) The Commission may adopt regulations about:
(i) the provision of medicine and medical, nursing, and hospital
services to a covered employee;
(ii) payment for the medicine and services; and
(iii) the exercise by the Chairman of the Commission of the powers
granted under § 9–662 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) The Commission may regulate fees and other charges for medical
services or treatment under this subtitle.
(2) (I) THE NOT LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REGULATE FEES AND OTHER CHARGES FOR THE
REIMBURSEMENT OF PRESCRIPTION DRUGS AND PHARMACEUTICAL SERVICES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE PROVIDED BY A PERSON WHO HOLDS A PHARMACY PERMIT
UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(II) REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE LIMITED TO AN INDEX OR INDEXES BASED ON ACQUISITION
COST, CALCULATED ON A PER UNIT BASIS, AS OF THE DATE OF DISPENSING AND MAY
INCLUDE:
1. REASONABLE DISPENSING FEES; AND
2. ANY OTHER PERCENTAGE INCREASE OR DECREASE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(III) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN INSURANCE
CARRIER OR EMPLOYER FROM CONTRACTING WITH A PHARMACY BENEFITS
MANAGER, A NETWORK OF PHARMACIES, OR DISPENSING PROVIDERS:
1. FOR REIMBURSEMENT RATES DIFFERENT THAN
THOSE ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION; OR
2. TO USE A PRICING INDEX OR INDEXES DIFFERENT
THAN THOSE SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(3) Each fee or other charge for medical service or treatment under this
subtitle is limited to the amount that prevails in the same community for similar treatment
of an injured individual with a standard of living that is comparable to that of the covered
employee.

SENATE BILL 306 3
[(3)] (4) At least once every 2 years, the Commission shall:
(i) review its guide of medical and surgical fees for completeness and
reasonableness; and
(ii) make appropriate revisions to the guide of medical and surgical
fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Prescription Drug Affordability Board:
(1) shall conduct a study on prescription drug affordability challenges
related to workers’ compensation claims that includes:
(i) an overview of prescription drug prescribing and billing practices
and trends that are specialized to the workers’ compensation market;
(ii) research into specific prescribing, billing, and dispensing
practices, including:
1. prescribing high cost formulations and compounded
formulations of commonly available drugs;
2. billing and dispensing from entities that do not bill or
provide services in the health insurance market; and
3. billing practices using billing codes without standardized
pricing metrics; and
(iii) making recommendations, if applicable, for policies to address
identified affordability challenges; and
(2) may require, subject to applicable federal and State laws, entities that
pay, prescribe, bill, and dispense prescription drugs under workers’ compensation claims
to report information to the Board as necessary to complete the study.
(b) On or before March 1, 2026, the Prescription Drug Affordability Board shall
report its findings and any recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee and the
House Economic Matters Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.